Massachusetts, session 194th, H4482.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The residents of the towns of Charlemont and Rowe, in the county of
Franklin, within the boundaries of said towns and qualified to vote in town affairs in their
respective towns, may establish a fire department for said territory or district, the officers of
which shall have charge of, and be responsible for, all the engines, apparatus and buildings for
the extinguishment of fires within said district, in the same manner as the fire departments and
the employees or volunteers of said departments are responsible.
SECTION 2. The first meeting of said district after the effective date of this act shall be
called by a joint notice from the select boards of Charlemont and Rowe, stating the date, time
and place for said district meeting. At the first meeting, the voters of said district shall elect by
ballot a moderator. At said meeting, the voters shall further elect by ballot a prudential
committee to consist of five persons to hold office, two until the expiration of three years, two
until the expiration of two years and one until the expiration of one year from the next
of 4

succeeding annual meeting, to constitute a board of fire commissioners, and at each annual
meeting thereafter one such commissioner shall be elected by ballot for the term of three years.
All the authority granted to said district by this act and not otherwise specifically provided for
shall be vested in said prudential committee, who shall be subject however to such instructions,
rules and regulations as said district may impose by its vote. A majority of said commissioners
shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. Any vacancy occurring in said board
from any cause may be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term by said district at any legal
meeting called for the purpose. Officers of the district shall be sworn into office by the
moderator or a justice of the peace. Assessors, treasurer, collector, and a fire chief will be
appointed by the prudential committee
SECTION 3. Said district shall raise by taxation annually a sum sufficient to pay the
current annual expenses of operating the firefighting operations, equipment, buildings and
personnel of the district, as well as the interest accruing on any bonds, notes or certificates of
debt issued by said district, together with such payments on the principal as may be required
under the provisions of this act. The assessors chosen as aforesaid shall assess and apportion all
and singular such sums of money voted to be raised by said district for the maintenance of said
fire department, and in making such assessments shall observe and conform to the requirements
of law obligatory upon assessors of towns; and they shall have all the power authority conferred
upon town assessors. The list of taxes made by the assessors as aforesaid shall be committed to
the collector of said district, for collecting the same; and the said collector shall observe all the
rules and regulations, and have all the authority conferred by law upon collectors of taxes for
towns, and said collector shall pay over all moneys so collected to the treasurer, who shall hold
the same subject to the order of the prudential committee. The district shall have the same legal
of 4

authority for collection of taxes as that held by municipalities, including but not limited to
takings pursuant to chapter 60 of the General Laws or other statutory provision.
SECTION 4. For the purpose of paying the necessary expenses and liabilities incurred
under this act, the district may, in addition to any other authority to borrow under the General
Laws, borrow from time to time such sums as may be necessary, and may issue bonds or notes
therefor. Each authorized issue shall constitute a separate loan, and such loans shall be payable in
not more than 30 years from their dates. Indebtedness incurred under this act shall be subject to
the provisions of chapter forty-four of the Massachusetts General Laws pertaining to such
districts.
SECTION 5. The district may, by a vote of qualified voter residents of the district at any
duly called district meeting, vote to increase the service area of the district into specific areas of
any abutting town. Such areas shall be delineated by a sufficient metes and bounds or other
description to establish the boundary of the district. Inhabitants of any such new areas of the
district, registered to vote in their town of residence, shall be subject to all benefits and
responsibilities of this act, including but not limited to liabilities for district taxation and
indebtedness as set forth in this act.
SECTION 6. All the provisions of this act and all the provisions of any and every act
passed subsequent to the said general act, and relating to the same subject, not inconsistent with
the foregoing provisions, shall be binding upon the inhabitants of said district; and the chief
engineer and the assistant engineers shall possess the same power and authority as are therein
delegated, and they, together with all of the other members of said fire department, shall be
entitled to the same privileges and immunities.
of 4

SECTION 7. The district shall be subject to all General Laws applicable to districts,
unless said statutes are inconsistent with the provisions of this act.
SECTION 8. The inhabitants of said district, so long as they shall maintain a sufficient
fire department therein for the reasonable protection of the inhabitants and property within said
limits from fire, shall be exempt from taxation in the respective towns to which they belong, for
the maintenance and support of other fire departments in said towns.
SECTION 9. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 4